District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.05

Fraudulent sale, obtaining, or furnishing of documents.

No person shall sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any diploma, license, certificate or registration, record, or other document required by this chapter, by any board, or by the Mayor.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1005, 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3310.5.